Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-1001
Assistance to the aged, blind, or disabled; program; administration.

There is hereby established in and for the State of Nebraska a program to be known as assistance to the aged, blind, or disabled, which assistance shall be administered by the Department of Health and Human Services. Such assistance shall consist of money payments to, medical care in behalf of, or any type of remedial care in behalf of needy individuals.

Laws 1965, c. 395, § 1, p. 1264;

Laws 1982, LB 522, § 36;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 304.